Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 9 Adulterated Liquors

3-9-1.
Appointment of assayer.

The director of business regulation may appoint an assayer of liquors, who shall perform the duties required by this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 33; G.L. 1909, ch. 177, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 74; G.L. 1938, ch. 173, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-9-1

.

3-9-2.
Analysis of liquors on request.

The assayer shall analyze all spirituous and intoxicating liquors when required by the attorney general or by the sheriff of any county or by the chief of police of any town or city or by the department of business regulation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 151, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 177, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 208, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 173, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-9-2

.

3-9-3.
Analysis fee.

For each analysis and certificate the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be taxed as a part of the costs to be paid by the defendant in any criminal case when the analysis and certificate have been made.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 151, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 177, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 208, § 3; P.L. 1925, ch. 584, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 173, § 3; P.L. 1976, ch. 243, § 1.

3-9-4.
Sale of impure or adulterated liquors — Misrepresentation of quality.

No person shall sell, keep for sale or offer to sell any impure or adulterated spirituous or intoxicating liquors, nor shall any person sell or keep for sale or offer for sale any liquors of quality inferior to what the liquors are represented to be.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 151, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 177, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 208, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 173, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

3-9-4

.

3-9-5.
Penalty for violations of § 3-9-4.

Any person keeping for sale or offering to sell or selling any liquors in violation of §

3-9-4

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300) or be imprisoned in an adult correctional institution for a period not exceeding three (3) months.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 151, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 177, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 208, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 173, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-9-5

.

3-9-6.
Sale of liquor with injurious ingredients.

Any person keeping for sale or offering to sell or selling any spirituous or intoxicating liquors which are adulterated with any poison or deleterious ingredients injurious to health, shall be fined not less than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned in the adult correctional institution for not less than three (3) months nor more than six (6) months; and upon the second conviction of a violation of this or of any preceding section of this chapter, the person convicted shall be sentenced to be both fined and imprisoned.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 151, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 177, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 208, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 173, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-9-6

.

3-9-7.
Forfeiture of impure or adulterated liquors.

In addition to the penalties provided for keeping or for offering for sale, or for selling impure or adulterated liquors, all those impure or adulterated liquors and the casks, barrels, or other vessels containing those impure or adulterated liquors, are forfeited to the state, and the provisions of §§

3-12-9

—

3-12-15

are made applicable as to authorize forfeitures of those impure or adulterated liquors and casks, barrels and other vessels containing those impure or adulterated liquors unlawfully possessed in the same manner as if those impure or adulterated liquors were mentioned in those sections.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 151, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 177, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 208, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 173, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

3-9-7

; P.L. 1965, ch. 168, § 2.

3-9-8.
Possession of impure or adulterated liquors as evidence of keeping for sale.

Having in possession, in a place of business or in any place, building, or dwelling where liquors are sold, of one gallon or upwards of impure or adulterated liquors is evidence that those impure or adulterated liquors are kept for sale by the person in whose possession those impure or adulterated liquors may be found.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 151, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 177, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 208, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 173, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

3-9-8

.

3-9-9.
False assays.

Every assayer who gives any false certificate of the quality of liquors assayed under of this chapter shall be imprisoned three (3) months.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 151, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 177, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 208, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 173, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

3-9-9

.

3-9-10.
Acceptance of gifts by assayers.

No assayer appointed under this chapter shall accept any reward or gratuity from any person in any way engaged in the sale of liquors, and every assayer receiving a reward or gratuity shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) or be imprisoned not exceeding three (3) months.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 151, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 177, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 208, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 173, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

3-9-10

.

3-9-11.
Civil liability for adulteration — Unlawful homicide.

Any person who, by the use of wood alcohol or other similar substance, adulterates any liquid intended to be used as a drink by a human being, is liable in treble damages to any person who consumes that adulterated preparation which the party consuming that adulterated preparation suffers. If the party consuming that adulterated preparation dies within one year after consuming that adulterated preparation, as a result of the consumption, the party guilty of the adulteration is deemed guilty of unlawful homicide in any degree in which the jury trying the case finds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 78; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

3-9-11

.